Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.300

No requirement to contract with speech-language pathology assistant.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to require that a health carrier defined in RCW 48.43.005 contract with a person certified as a speech-language pathology assistant under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 301 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Implementation—2009 c 301: See notes following RCW 18.35.010.

Speech-language pathology assistants—Certification requirements—2009 c 301: See note following RCW 18.35.040.